Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Display of Motto

6.330.
“In God We Trust” to be displayed above dais of Speaker of the House of Representatives.

In commemoration of the fiftieth anniversary of the resolution which passed through the 84th United States Congress and subsequently was signed by President Dwight D. Eisenhower on July 30, 1956, thereby making “In God We Trust” the national motto of the United States, the General Assembly hereby directs the Legislative Research Commission to display the national motto “In God We Trust” on the wall directly above and behind the dais of the Speaker of the Kentucky House of Representatives. The display shall be consistent with the historic and patriotic display of the national motto located directly above and behind the dais of the Speaker of the United States House of Representatives.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 34, § 5, effective March 24, 2006.